Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 1 General Provisions

42-4-1.
Appointment of county and municipal jailers.

By virtue of their offices, sheriffs are jailers of the counties and have the authority to appoint other jailers, subject to the supervision of the county governing authority, as prescribed by law.

By virtue of their offices, chiefs of police are the jailers of the municipal corporations and have the authority to appoint other jailers, subject to the supervision of the municipal governing authority, as prescribed by law. Each jailer of a municipal corporation shall maintain the records required of sheriffs by subsection (a) of Code Section 42-4-7.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 331; Code 1868, § 392; Code 1873, § 356; Code 1882, § 356; Penal Code 1895, § 1120; Penal Code 1910, § 1149; Code 1933, § 77-101; Ga. L. 1988, p. 266, § 1.

Cross references.

Sheriffs generally, T. 15, C. 16.

42-4-2.
Oath and bond of jailers.

Before commencing to carry out the duties of their office, jailers must give to the sheriff a bond and surety for the sum of $1,000.00, conditioned for the faithful performance of their duties as jailers, and shall take and subscribe before the sheriff of their respective counties, to be filed in and entered into the records of the sheriff’s office, the following oath:

“I do swear that I will well and truly do and perform, all and singular, the duties of jailer for the County of
_______________ ; and that I will humanely treat prisoners who may be brought to the jail of which I am keeper and not suffer them to escape by any negligence or inattention of mine. So help me God.”

History.

Laws 1811, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 201, 202; Code 1863, § 332; Code 1868, § 393; Code 1873, § 357; Code 1882, § 357; Penal Code 1895, § 1121; Penal Code 1910, § 1150; Code 1933, § 77-102; Ga. L. 1987, p. 342, § 1.

42-4-3.
When coroner to act as keeper of jail.

The county coroner shall be keeper of the jail when the sheriff is imprisoned or absent from the county leaving no deputy.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 564; Code 1868, § 628; Code 1873, § 587; Code 1882, § 587; Penal Code 1895, § 1122; Penal Code 1910, § 1151; Code 1933, § 77-105.

Cross references.

Coroners generally, T. 45, C. 16.

42-4-4.
Duties of sheriff as to jail inmates; designation of inmate as trusty; failure to comply with Code section.

It shall be the duty of the sheriff:

To take from the outgoing sheriff custody of the jail and the bodies of such persons as are confined therein, along with the warrant or cause of commitment;

To furnish persons confined in the jail with medical aid, heat, and blankets, to be reimbursed if necessary from the county treasury, for neglect of which he shall be liable to suffer the penalty prescribed in this Code section; provided, however, that, with respect to an inmate covered under Article 3 of this chapter, the officer in charge will provide such person access to medical aid and may arrange for the person’s health insurance carrier to pay the health care provider for the aid rendered; and

To take all persons arrested or in execution under any criminal or civil process to the jail of an adjoining county, or to the jail of some other county if the latter is more accessible, if the jail of his county is in an unsafe condition, under such rules as are prescribed in this chapter.

Subject to the provisions of this subsection and except as provided by law or as directed by a court of competent jurisdiction, a sheriff shall not release a prisoner from his custody prior to the lawful completion of his sentence including any lawful credits under a trusty system. The provision shall not, however, preclude a sheriff from designating an inmate as a trusty and utilizing him in a lawful manner and, furthermore, this provision shall not preclude a sheriff from transferring a prisoner to another jail in another county if the sheriff concludes that such transfer is in the best interest of the prisoner or that such transfer is necessary for the orderly administration of the jail.

Any sheriff or deputy who fails to comply with this Code section shall be fined for contempt, as is the clerk of the superior court in similar cases. The sheriff or deputy shall also be subject to removal from office as prescribed in Code Section 15-16-26.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 574; Laws 1810, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 577; Laws 1818, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 858; Laws 1820, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 480; Laws 1823, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 512; Code 1863, §§ 336, 340; Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 64, § 15; Code 1868, §§ 397, 401; Code 1873, §§ 361, 366; Code 1882, §§ 361, 366; Penal Code 1895, §§ 1127, 1128; Penal Code 1910, §§ 1156, 1157; Code 1933, §§ 77-110, 77-111; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1443, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2125, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 173, § 2-10/HB 665.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “Code Section 15-16-26” for “Code Section 15-6-82” at the end of the second sentence of subsection (c).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, “trusty” was substituted for “trustee” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

Law reviews.

For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 310 (1992).

42-4-5.
Cruelty to inmates.

No jailer, by duress or other cruel treatment, shall make or induce an inmate to accuse or give evidence against another; nor shall he be guilty of willful inhumanity or oppression to any inmate under his care and custody.

Any jailer who violates subsection (a) of this Code section shall be punished by removal from office and imprisonment for not less than one year nor longer than three years.

History.

Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 805; Code 1863, § 4367; Code 1868, § 4405; Code 1873, § 4473; Code 1882, § 4473; Penal Code 1895, § 282; Penal Code 1910, § 286; Code 1933, §§ 77-104, 77-9901.

Cross references.

Prohibition against cruel and unusual punishment, U.S. Const., amend. 8 and Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. XVII.

42-4-6.
Confinement and care of tubercular inmates; crediting of time spent in hospital or institution against sentence.

When any person confined in the common jail who is awaiting trial for any offense against the penal laws of this state or who has been convicted of an offense or who is serving any jail sentence imposed upon him by authority or who has been committed for any civil or criminal contempt or who is serving any misdemeanor sentence under county jurisdiction in a county correctional institution or other institution for the maintenance of county inmates is afflicted with tuberculosis, the judge of the superior court may order the person’s delivery by the sheriff to an institution as may be approved and supported by the Department of Public Health for the care of tubercular patients; thereupon, he shall be so delivered and received in such institution and shall be securely confined, kept, and cared for.

The period of time a person is kept and confined in a hospital or institution pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall be credited upon any jail sentence being served by him, in the same manner as though he had remained in jail. Any person committed for any civil or criminal contempt shall remain for all purposes under the orders, jurisdiction, and authority of the court committing him for contempt while in the hospital or institution, in the same manner as though he had remained in the common jail.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 769, § 2; Ga. L. 1964, p. 365, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 42; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Cross references.

Hospitalization of persons for tuberculosis, T. 31, C. 14.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

42-4-7.
Maintenance of inmate record by sheriff; earned time allowances.

The sheriff shall keep a record of all persons committed to the jail of the county of which he or she is sheriff. This record shall contain the name of the person committed, such person’s age, sex, race, under what process such person was committed and from what court the process issued, the crime with which the person was charged, the date of such person’s commitment to jail, the day of such person’s discharge, under what order such person was discharged, and the court from which the order issued. This record shall be subject to examination by any person in accordance with the provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, relating to the inspection of public records.

The sheriff, chief jailer, warden, or other officer designated by the county as custodian of inmates confined as county inmates for probation violations of felony offenses or as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 17-10-3 may award earned time allowances to such inmates based on institutional behavior. Earned time allowances shall not be awarded which exceed one-half of the period of confinement imposed, except that the sheriff or other custodian may authorize the award of not more than four days’ credit for each day on which an inmate does work on an authorized work detail; provided, however, that such increased credit for performance on a work detail shall not apply to an inmate who is incarcerated for:

A second or subsequent offense of driving under the influence under Code Section 40-6-391 within a five-year period of time, as measured from the date of any previous arrest for which a conviction was obtained or a plea of nolo contendere was accepted to the date of the current arrest for which a conviction is obtained or a plea of nolo contendere is accepted;

A misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature; or

A crime committed against a family member as defined in Code Section 19-13-1.

While an inmate sentenced to confinement as a county inmate is in custody as a county inmate, the custodian of such inmate may award an earned time allowance consistent with this subsection and subsection (b) of Code Section 17-10-4 based on the institutional behavior of such inmate while in custody as a county inmate.

An inmate sentenced to confinement as a county inmate shall be released at the expiration of his or her sentence less the time deducted for earned time allowances.

Commencing January 1, 1984, those provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section which provide for good-time allowances to be awarded to inmates sentenced to confinement as county inmates as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 17-10-3 shall apply to all such inmates in confinement on December 31, 1983, and all inmates who commit crimes on or after January 1, 1984, and are subsequently convicted and sentenced to confinement as county inmates. Conversion of the computation of the sentences of county inmates in confinement on December 31, 1983, from earned time governed sentences to good-time governed sentences shall be made by the sheriff or other custodian of such inmates. Commencing July 1, 1994, those provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section which provide for good-time allowances to be awarded to inmates sentenced to confinement as county inmates for probation violations of felony offenses shall apply to all such inmates in confinement on June 30, 1994, and all inmates whose probation is revoked or who commit crimes on or after July 1, 1994, and are subsequently sentenced to confinement as county inmates. Commencing July 1, 2000, the award of earned time allowances pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section for persons who commit crimes on or after July 1, 2000, and are subsequently convicted and sentenced to confinement as county inmates and inmates whose probation is revoked on or after July 1, 2000, or who commit crimes on or after July 1, 2000, and are subsequently sentenced to confinement as county inmates is not automatic or mandatory but shall be based upon institutional behavior.

History.

Ga. L. 1877, p. 111, § 1; Code 1882, § 366a; Penal Code 1895, § 1125; Penal Code 1910, § 1154; Code 1933, § 77-108; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1340, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 632, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1955, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1111, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 155, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, “of felony offenses” was substituted for “of, felony offenses,” in the first sentence of paragraph (b)(1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1111, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2000, and shall apply to persons who commit crimes on or after such date and who are subsequently convicted and sentenced to confinement as county inmates and to persons whose probation is revoked on or after such date or who commit crimes on or after such date and who subsequently are sentenced to confinement as county inmates.”

42-4-8.
Inquiry into contents of inmate record by grand jury; failure to comply with Code Section 42-4-7.

It shall be the duty of the grand jury, at each term of the superior court held in the county, to inquire into the contents of the record kept by the sheriff as required by Code Section 42-4-7. If the record is not kept or is incorrectly kept, the grand jury shall so report to the court. Upon the report’s being made, the judge presiding shall cause the district attorney to have the sheriff served with a rule requiring him to show cause why he should not be punished for contempt. The judge shall inquire into the facts and, if he finds that Code Section 42-4-7 has not been complied with, he shall impose a fine of not less than $25.00 nor more than $50.00 for the first offense and not more than $100.00 and not less than $50.00 for each subsequent offense. The fines shall be enforced and collected by attachment, as in other cases of attachments against sheriffs.

History.

Ga. L. 1877, p. 111, § 2; Code 1882, § 366b; Penal Code 1895, § 1126; Penal Code 1910, § 1155; Code 1933, § 77-109; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 42.

Cross references.

Frequency with which grand jury must perform duties, §

15-12-71

.

42-4-9.
Conditions for receipt of federal prisoners.

The keeper of a county jail may decline to receive a person from the custody of anyone acting under the authority of the United States government. He may receive the person if the consent of the authority having control of county matters is first obtained. If the keeper receives the person he shall have the same duties and responsibilities toward him as in the case of inmates committed under the authority of this state.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 334; Code 1868, § 395; Code 1873, § 359; Code 1882, § 359; Ga. L. 1889, p. 47, § 2; Penal Code 1895, § 1123; Penal Code 1910, § 1152; Code 1933, § 77-106.

42-4-10.
Receipt of additional federal prisoners after initial acceptance.

If the keeper of the jail consents to receive a person from the custody of federal authorities, as provided in Code Section 42-4-9, neither the jailer nor the county authorities shall refuse to receive any other person so committed by the authority of the United States government unless 20 days’ prior written notice of the sheriff’s refusal to receive any more persons committed by the federal authorities is given by him to the United States marshal or other federal officers charged with the custody of such persons.

History.

Ga. L. 1889, p. 47, § 3; Penal Code 1895, § 1124; Penal Code 1910, § 1153; Code 1933, § 77-107.

42-4-11.
Procedure for transfer of person in custody upon change of venue.

In all cases in which a change of venue is made, the sheriff of the county from which a person in custody is to be moved shall carry the person to the county to which the change of venue was directed and deliver him to the sheriff of such county, who shall then take charge of the person as in other cases. The sheriff of the county from which the person is to be moved shall carry with him and deliver to the sheriff the warrant under which the person was arrested or the commitment.

History.

Ga. L. 1868, p. 133, § 1; Code 1873, § 4688; Code 1882, § 4688; Penal Code 1895, § 1129; Penal Code 1910, § 1158; Code 1933, § 77-112.

Cross references.

Change of venue generally, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. II, Para. VIII and §

17-7-150

et seq.

42-4-12.
Penalty for refusal by officer to receive persons charged with or guilty of offense.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, any sheriff, constable, keeper of a jail, or other officer whose duty it is to receive persons charged with or guilty of an indictable offense who refuses to receive and take charge of such a person shall, upon conviction thereof, be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than $1,000.00. A sheriff, constable, keeper of a jail, or other officer whose duty it is to receive persons charged with or guilty of an indictable offense shall be authorized to refuse acceptance of any person who has not received medical treatment for obvious physical injuries or conditions of an emergency nature. Upon such refusal, it shall be the responsibility of the arresting agency to take the individual to a health care facility or health care provider in order to secure a medical release. Upon medical release by the health care facility or health care provider, the sheriff, constable, or keeper of the jail must assume custody of the individual; provided, however, that in all cases the sheriff, constable, or keeper of the jail must assume custody where no health care facility is located in the county in which the arrest occurred and, in such instances, the governing authority of the arresting agency shall pay all costs related to the medical release.

History.

Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 807; Code 1863, § 4380; Code 1868, § 4418; Code 1873, § 4486; Code 1882, § 4486; Penal Code 1895, § 285; Penal Code 1910, § 289; Code 1933, § 77-9902; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1638, § 1.

Law reviews.

For review of 1996 legislation relating to jails, see 13 Ga. U. L. Rev. 269 and 273 (1996).

42-4-13.
Possession of drugs, weapons, alcohol, or tobacco products by inmates.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Alcoholic beverage” means and includes all alcohol, distilled spirits, beer, malt beverage, wine, or fortified wine.

“Controlled substance” means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor as defined in Code Section 16-13-21.

“Dangerous drug” has the same meaning as defined by Code Section 16-13-71.

(3.1)

“Inmate” means a prisoner, detainee, criminal suspect, immigration detainee, or other person held, incarcerated, or detained in a jail, whether or not such person is inside or outside of the jail.

“Jail” means any county jail, municipal jail, or any jail or detention facility operated by a county, municipality, or a regional jail authority as authorized under Article 5 of this chapter.

“Jailer” means the sheriff in the case of any county jail, or the chief of police if the jail is under the supervision of the chief of police of a municipality, or the warden, captain, administrator, superintendent, or other officer having supervision of any other jail, or the designee of such officer.

It shall be unlawful for an inmate to possess any controlled substance, dangerous drug, gun, pistol, or other dangerous weapon or marijuana.

Any person who violates paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned for not less than one nor more than five years.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, possession of a controlled substance, a dangerous drug, or marijuana shall be punished as provided in Chapter 13 of Title 16; provided, however, that the provisions of Code Section 16-13-2 shall not apply to a violation of paragraph (1) of this subsection.

The provisions of this subsection shall not prohibit the lawful use or dispensing of a controlled substance or dangerous drug to an inmate with the knowledge and consent of the jailer when such use or dispensing is lawful under the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 16.

Unless otherwise authorized by law or the jailer, it shall be unlawful for an inmate to possess any alcoholic beverage or tobacco or any product containing tobacco.

Any person who violates paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

It shall be unlawful for any person to come inside the guard lines established at any jail with, or to give or have delivered to an inmate, any controlled substance, dangerous drug, marijuana, or any gun, pistol, or other dangerous weapon without the knowledge and consent of the jailer or a law enforcement officer.

It shall be unlawful for any person to come inside the guard lines established at any jail with, or to give or have delivered to an inmate, any alcoholic beverage without the knowledge and consent of the jailer or a law enforcement officer; provided, however, that the provisions of this subsection shall not apply to nor prohibit the use of an alcoholic beverage by a clergyman or priest in sacramental services only.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, any person who violates subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned for not less than one nor more than five years. Any person who violates subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection, the possession, possession with intent to distribute, trafficking, or distribution of a controlled substance or marijuana shall be punished as provided in Chapter 13 of Title 16; provided, however, that the provisions of Code Section 16-13-2 shall not apply to a violation of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this subsection.

(d.1) (1)

It shall be unlawful for any person to obtain for, to procure for, or to give to an inmate tobacco or any product containing tobacco without the knowledge and consent of the jailer.

It shall be unlawful for any person to obtain, to procure for, or to give to an inmate, or to bring within the guard lines, any other article or item without the knowledge and consent of the jailer or a law enforcement officer. Any person violating this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

It shall be unlawful for any person to come inside the guard lines or be within any jail while under the influence of a controlled substance, dangerous drug, or marijuana without the knowledge and consent of the jailer or a law enforcement officer unless such person has a valid prescription for such controlled substance or dangerous drug issued by a person licensed under Chapter 11 or 34 of Title 43 and such prescribed substance is consumed only as authorized by the prescription. Any person convicted of a violation of this subsection shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than four years.

It shall be unlawful for any person to come inside the guard lines or be within any jail while under the influence of alcohol without the knowledge and consent of the jailer or a law enforcement officer. Any person violating this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

It shall be unlawful for any person to loiter where inmates are assigned after having been ordered by the jailer or a law enforcement officer to desist therefrom. Any person violating this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

It shall be unlawful for any person to attempt, conspire, or solicit another to commit any offense defined by this Code section and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment not exceeding the maximum punishment prescribed for the offense, the commission of which was the object of the attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation.

Any violation of this Code section shall constitute a separate offense.

Perimeter guard lines shall be established at every jail by the jailer thereof. Such guard lines shall be clearly marked by signs on which shall be plainly stamped or written: “Guard line of _______________ .” Signs shall also be placed at all entrances and exits for vehicles and pedestrians at the jail and at such intervals along the guard lines as will reasonably place all persons approaching the guard lines on notice of the location of the jail.

(2)

Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 611, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 630, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 648, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 42; Ga. L. 2017, p. 673, § 3-1/SB 149.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added paragraph (a)(3.1); deleted “of a jail” following “inmate” in paragraphs (b)(1) and (c)(1) and in subparagraphs (d)(1)(A) and (d)(1)(B); in paragraph (c)(1), inserted “or the jailer” near the beginning, and added “or tobacco or any product containing tobacco” at the end; and added subsection (d.1).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1989, the subsection (a) designation was added at the beginning of this Code section.

Law reviews.

For note on 1993 amendment of this Code section, see 10 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 181 (1993).

42-4-14.
“Illegal alien” defined; determination of nationality and verification of lawful admission of person confined in a jail facility.

As used in this Code section, the term “illegal alien” means a person who is verified by the federal government to be present in the United States in violation of federal immigration law.

When any person is confined, for any period, in the jail of a county or municipality or a jail operated by a regional jail authority in compliance with Article 36 of the Vienna Convention on Consular Relations, a reasonable effort shall be made to determine the nationality of the person so confined.

When any foreign national is confined, for any period, in a county or municipal jail, a reasonable effort shall be made to verify that such foreign national has been lawfully admitted to the United States and if lawfully admitted, that such lawful status has not expired. If verification of lawful status cannot be made from documents in the possession of the foreign national, verification shall be made within 48 hours through a query to the Law Enforcement Support Center (LESC) of the United States Department of Homeland Security or other office or agency designated by the federal government. If the foreign national is determined to be an illegal alien, the keeper of the jail or other officer shall notify the United States Department of Homeland Security, or other office or agency designated for notification by the federal government.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to deny a person bond or from being released from confinement when such person is otherwise eligible for release; provided, however, that upon verification that any person confined in a jail is an illegal alien, such person may be detained, arrested, and transported as authorized by state and federal law.

The Georgia Sheriffs Association shall prepare and issue guidelines and procedures used to comply with the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 105, § 5/SB 529; Ga. L. 2008, p. 1137, § 4/SB 350; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 42/SB 46; Ga. L. 2009, p. 970, § 2/HB 2; Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 13/HB 87.

Editor’s notes.

The catchline for this Code section is set out above to better reflect the statutory provisions.

Code Commission notes.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 42, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2009, p. 970, § 2, effective January 1, 2010. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006. p. 105, § 1/SB 529, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Security and Immigration Compliance Act.’
All requirements of this Act concerning immigration or the classification of immigration status shall be construed in conformity with federal immigration law.”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 1/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Illegal Immigration Reform and Enforcement Act of 2011.’ ”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 21/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “(a) If any provision or part of any provision of this Act or the application of the same is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity shall not affect the other provisions or applications of this Act or any other part of this Act than can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this Act are severable.

“(b) The terms of this Act regarding immigration shall be construed to have the meanings consistent with such terms under federal immigration law.

“(c) The provisions of this Act shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws governing immigration and civil rights.”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 22/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall apply to offenses and violations occurring on or after July 1, 2011.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 enactment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 247 (2006).

For article, “The Georgia Security and Immigration Compliance Act: Comprehensive Immigration Reform in Georgia — ‘Think Globally . . . Act Locally’,” see 13 Ga. St. B. J. 14 (2007).

42-4-15.
Limitations on medical charges for providing emergency medical care services to individuals in custody.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Detainee” means a person held in a detention facility who is charged with or convicted of a criminal offense or charged with or adjudicated for a delinquent act and a person detained, arrested, or otherwise held in lawful custody for a criminal offense or delinquent act.

“Detention facility” means any municipal or county jail or other facility used for the detention of persons charged with or convicted of a criminal offense or charged with or adjudicated for a delinquent act.

“Emergency health care” means bona fide emergency services provided after the onset of a medical or traumatic condition manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity such that the absence of immediate medical attention could reasonably be expected to result in placing the person’s health in serious jeopardy, serious impairment to bodily functions, or serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part. The term covers any form of emergency medical treatment, including dental, optical, psychological, or other types of emergency conditions.

“Follow-up health care” means medical and hospital care and medication administered in conjunction with and arising from emergency health care treatment.

A hospital or other health care facility licensed or established pursuant to Chapter 7 of Title 31 which is not a party to an emergency health care services contract with a sheriff or a governing authority or its agent on July 1, 2011, shall be reimbursed no more than the applicable Georgia Medicaid rate for emergency health care and follow-up health care services provided to a detainee.

No hospital or other health care facility shall discharge a detainee with an emergency health care condition so as to require an immediate transfer to another medical provider for the same condition unless the reasonable standard of care requires such a transfer.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to limit reimbursements for emergency health care services when insurance coverage is available for payment for such services. Nor shall this Code section be construed so as to limit or remove responsibility for payment of emergency health care services by a provider of insurance that is otherwise responsible for payment of part or all of such services.

Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit the governing authority from negotiating higher fees or rates with hospitals.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 440, § 1/HB 197.